Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 25-10-109.
Emergency detention.

A person may be detained when:

A law enforcement officer or examiner has reasonable cause to believe a person is mentally ill pursuant to W.S.

25-10-101

;

A court has entered an ex parte order for immediate detention of a person pursuant to W.S.

25-10-110

.1(h);

A hospital revokes convalescent status release of a person pursuant to W.S. 25-10-127(b) based on a previous or current determination of mental illness.

Immediately after detaining the person, the officer shall contact an examiner. A preliminary examination of the person shall be conducted by an examiner within twenty-four (24) hours after the detention. If a preliminary examination is not conducted within twenty-four (24) hours the detained person shall be released. If the person is detained following the preliminary examination, an examiner shall reexamine the person not less than every forty-eight (48) hours until the hearing under subsections (h) through (k) of this section. If the examiner giving the preliminary examination, or any reexamination as required by this subsection, finds that the person:

Is not mentally ill, the person shall be released immediately;

Was mentally ill, but is no longer dangerous to himself or others, the examiner shall, with patient consent, arrange follow up mental health care and the person shall be released immediately; or

Is mentally ill, the person may be detained for seventy-two (72) hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays.

No person shall be detained for more than seventy-two (72) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, without a hearing under subsections (h) through (k) of this section.

A person taken into custody under this section may be detained in a hospital or other care setting which is appropriate under the circumstances and which complies with subsection (n) of this section. The person shall not be detained in a nonmedical facility used for detention of persons charged with or convicted of penal offenses except in extreme emergency or if there are no other reasonable alternatives. The law enforcement officer or examiner who detained the person shall immediately notify the person responsible for the care and custody of the detained person, if known, of the time and place of detention.

The law enforcement officer or examiner who initially detained the person shall make a written statement of the facts of the emergency detention. A copy of the statement shall be given to the detained person, his parent or guardian, to any attorney representing the person, to the county attorney in the county where the person is detained, to any gatekeeper designated by the department and to any subsequent examiner.

When a person is detained under emergency circumstances, treatment may be given during the emergency detention period if the person voluntarily and knowingly consents. The parent or guardian of a minor or incompetent person may consent to treatment. If the parent or guardian of a minor patient does not consent to treatment, a petition may be filed under the Child Protection Act. Treatment may be given without the consent of the detained person or his parent or guardian when treatment is limited to diagnosis or evaluation or when treatment is necessary to prevent immediate and serious physical harm to the person or others. Prior to treatment, the person shall be fully advised of the scope of treatment, and a report of the treatment shall be provided to the county attorney, to any gatekeeper designated by the department and shall be filed with the court if continued detention is sought, or if directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization proceedings are commenced. An examiner or a physician who provides treatment in good faith pursuant to this subsection shall be immune from civil liability for the treatment except there shall be no immunity from liability for negligent acts or deliberate misconduct.

At the time of emergency detention the person shall be informed orally and in writing of his right to contact his family and an attorney, of his right to appointed counsel if he is indigent, of his right to remain silent and that his statements may be used as a basis for continued detention, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization.

When a person is detained in emergency detention and continued detention is sought, or an application for directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization is filed by the county attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the detained person unless he has his own attorney. The court shall conduct a hearing within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, of the initial detention to determine whether continued detention is required pending directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization proceedings. The county attorney of the county where the application is filed shall appear on behalf of the state at the hearing. Any gatekeeper designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g) shall appear at the hearing and provide testimony concerning continued detention and, if applicable, the issues outlined in subsection (m) of this section. Notice of the preliminary hearing shall be given to the county attorney, any gatekeeper designated by the department, the detained person and his parent, guardian and attorney. The court may delay the hearing only at the request of the detained person or his parent, guardian or his attorney. The hearing for continued detention may be waived at the request of the detained person or the detained person’s parent, guardian or attorney. If a hearing for continued detention has been waived, the court may immediately conduct the directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization hearing.

At the hearing the court shall advise the detained person and his parent, guardian or attorney of the contents of the written statement of emergency detention required in subsection (e) of this section and the application for directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization.

The standard of proof in an emergency detention hearing shall be by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds at an emergency detention hearing that:

The person is not mentally ill, the court shall order the person released;

The person is mentally ill and has applied for and received voluntary admission, the court may dismiss the proceedings; or

The person is mentally ill, it shall order continued detention of the person for not more than ten (10) days. The court may extend the detention period at the request of the proposed patient or his attorney.

If the court finds the person is mentally ill pursuant to paragraph (k)(iii) of this section, the court shall make findings as to the person’s competence to make informed choices regarding treatment and the person’s need for prescribed psychotropic medication. If the court finds the person incompetent to make an informed decision, the court may order the administration of prescribed psychotropic medication for the period of the emergency detention for restabilization of the person’s mental health.

Treatment provided as a result of an emergency or continued detention pursuant to this section shall be provided in the least restrictive and most therapeutic setting available with consideration given to requests of the detained person, his parent, guardian or attorney, and recommendations of any gatekeeper. Treatment may include the treatment options outlined in W.S.

25-10-110

.1(d).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 25-58; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-110; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 87, § 1; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 1990, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 172, § 2; 2011, ch. 54, § 1; 2013 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016; 2017 ch. 96, § 1, effective March 2, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (h), added the present last two sentences.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the third sentence in (f).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (h), added “by the county attorney” following “involuntary hospitalization is filed,” added the present second sentence, in the third sentence, added “the county attorney” following “the detained person and his attorney.”

The 2016 amendment

rewrote the act, which formerly read, “Subject to the rules and regulations of the hospital, the head of a hospital may admit persons who have symptoms of mental illness pursuant to W.S.

25-10-106

,

25-10-109

or

25-10-110

.”

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

The 2017 amendment,

in (a), added (a)(i),(a)(ii), and (a)(ii) and made a related change; in the introductory language of (b), added the third sentence and added “or any reexamination as required by this subsection” to the last sentence; in (b)(ii), substituted “examiner shall, with patient consent, arrange follow up mental health care and the person shall be” for “person shall be”; in (d), substituted “care setting” for “suitable facility”, added “and which complies with subsection (n) of this section” to the first sentence, and added “or examiner” following “officer” in the last sentence; in (e), added “his parent or guardian, to any attorney representing the person, to the county attorney in the county where the person is detained” in the second sentence; in (f),
added “to the county attorney,” “shall be,” and “continued detention is sought, or if” to the fourth sentence; in (g) added “continued detention” following “basis for”; rewrote (h); in (k)(ii) added “and received”; and added (n).

Laws 2017, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

County attorney’s duties. —

Because statutes with respect to the specific duties of a county attorney in emergency detention and involuntary hospitalization proceedings are ambiguous, the district court did not err in denying appellants' petition for a writ of mandamus directing the county attorney to commence court proceedings and to appear at initial emergency detention hearings as well as to appear and present the case in chief. State ex rel. W. Park Hosp. Dist. v. Skoric, 2014 WY 41, 321 P.3d 334,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2014).

Involuntary hospitalization order reversed where no hearing to determine necessity of continued detention. —

As the court, sua sponte, treated the preliminary hearing following emergency detention as a hearing on the involuntary hospitalization application, no hearing to determine the necessity of continued detention being held within 36 (now (72)) hours, as required by subsection (h), the trial court's finding that the person in question was “mentally ill,” and its order for involuntary hospitalization, had to be reversed. In Interest of AM, 694 P.2d 734,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 441

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Culver v. Town of Torrington, 930 F.2d 1456, 1991 U.S. App. LEXIS 6203 (10th Cir. 1991).

Stated

in

Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2005).

Cited

in

Vit v. State, 909 P.2d 953,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1996); Baker v. State, 2002 WY 116, 50 P.3d 712,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2002); Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003).

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

§ 25-10-110.
Involuntary hospitalization proceedings.

Proceedings for the involuntary hospitalization of a person may be commenced by the filing of a written application with the court in the county in which the person is initially detained. Proceedings may also be initiated in the county in which there is a designated hospital if there is a written agreement executed by the county in which the person resides and the designated hospital stating that the county in which the person resides will be responsible for costs of treatment under W.S. 25-10-112(e) that are not covered by the state. The application shall be accompanied by either:

A certificate of an examiner stating:

That he has examined the proposed patient not more than fifteen (15) days prior to the date that the application was filed under this subsection;

His findings and the proposed patient’s history; and

His opinion that the proposed patient is mentally ill; or

A written statement by the applicant and by an examiner that the proposed patient has refused to submit to examination by an examiner, together with a statement of the facts and circumstances supporting the application.

Unless the proposed patient is represented by counsel, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent him.

Proceedings under this section shall be entitled “In the Interest of . . . . . ”. The county attorney of the county where the application is filed shall appear in the public interest. The court shall expedite the proceedings.

Upon receipt of an application, the court shall issue notice thereof to the proposed patient, the person responsible for the care or custody of the proposed patient, any gatekeeper designated by the department and other persons designated by the court. The notice shall be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. The notice shall apprise the proposed patient:

Of the purpose of the proceeding;

Of the identity of the appointed examiner, and his authority to conduct an examination;

Of his right to counsel, the identity of counsel appointed by the court to represent him and his right to counsel of his own selection;

Of the requirements for an involuntary hospitalization order under subsection (j) of this section;

Of the basis for the proposed hospitalization, including a detailed statement of the facts and supporting testimony;

That a hearing will be held if warranted by the report of the examination of the proposed patient; and

Of the identity of any gatekeeper designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g).

The court shall appoint one (1) or more examiners to examine the proposed patient and to make a written report to the court of the findings as to the history and mental illness of the proposed patient. The court may order the proposed patient to appear for examination and if the proposed patient does not appear the court may compel his appearance. The examination shall be held at a hospital, a medical facility, the home of the proposed patient or any other suitable place which will not have a harmful effect on his health. The examination shall be conducted no later than seven (7) days from the date of the notice. If the examination is conducted by an examiner other than a licensed physician, licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist, the court shall appoint a licensed physician, licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist to review the findings of the examiner and conduct a further examination, if indicated, and to report to the court.

If the examiner reports the proposed patient is not mentally ill, the court shall terminate the proceedings. If the examiner reports the proposed patient is mentally ill, the court shall fix a date for and give notice of a hearing to be held as soon as possible. The notice shall satisfy the requirements of paragraphs (d)(i) through (vii) of this section.

Within five (5) days of receipt of the notice of hearing, the proposed patient or his counsel may request a hearing before a jury. If upon the basis of the appointed examiner’s report or from other information available to the court, the court concludes that the proposed patient does not understand his rights, the court may call a jury upon its own motion or upon the request of the person responsible for the care and custody of the proposed patient. A jury shall be selected pursuant to W.S.

1-11-101

through

1-11-129

, and the proceedings shall follow the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The proposed patient, the applicant, and all others to whom notice is required may appear at the hearing to testify and may present witnesses. The court shall consider the testimony of any gatekeeper designated by the department and may receive the testimony of other persons. The proposed patient shall be present at the hearing unless he waives his right to appear. All persons not necessary to protect the rights of the parties shall be excluded from the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner as is consistent with orderly procedure and in a physical setting which will not have a harmful effect on the mental health of the proposed patient. Any hearing conducted under this subsection shall be recorded by the court reporter or by electronic, mechanical or other appropriate means.

If, upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, the court or the jury finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed patient is mentally ill the court shall consider the least restrictive and most therapeutic alternatives, give consideration to any recommendations by the gatekeeper and shall:

Order his hospitalization, assign him to a hospital, and:

Send to the hospital, with the patient a certified copy of the findings of fact and order and a copy of the examiner’s report;

Specify where he will be detained pending transportation to the hospital. No person shall be detained in a nonmedical facility used for detention of persons charged with or convicted of penal offenses except during an extreme emergency;

Order his transportation to the hospital with proper clothing and personal effects;

Notify his next of kin or the person responsible for his care and custody and the proposed treatment provider or hospital of the court’s order;

Make findings as to his competence to make informed choices regarding treatment and his need for prescribed psychotropic medication. If the court finds the person incompetent to make an informed decision, the court may order the administration of prescribed psychotropic medication. The order for medication shall be reviewed by a physician upon commitment and by a psychiatrist upon admission to the hospital. The prescribed medication shall be continued if found medically appropriate by the investigation review committee of the hospital or institution, subject to review by the medical director of the hospital or institution. Any action by the medical director of the hospital or institution shall be reviewable pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. All orders for prescribed medication or a summary of all orders shall be provided to the gatekeeper designated by the department under W.S. 25-10-112(g).

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 3.

Order the proposed patient be treated in a directed outpatient commitment pursuant to W.S.

25-10-110

.1 if the court finds continuous inpatient hospitalization is not required and the proposed patient would be more appropriately treated in a directed outpatient commitment; or

Order any disposition for which private resources are available and which is consistent with the best interests of the proposed patient and with public safety.

The court is authorized to appoint a special commissioner to assist in the conduct of hospitalization proceedings. In proceedings under this act, regularly appointed court commissioners may exercise the authority granted by W.S.

5-3-307

. In any case in which the court refers an application to the commissioner, the commissioner shall conduct the directed outpatient commitment under W.S.

25-10-110

.1 or the involuntary hospitalization proceedings under this section and on the basis thereof shall either recommend dismissal of the application or hold a hearing as provided in this section and make recommendations to the court regarding the disposition of the proposed patient and of the proceedings.

An appointed examiner shall receive for his services in each court ordered examination a reasonable fee fixed by the court.

The court shall inquire into the medical condition of every patient found to be mentally ill. If the court determines based upon the advice of a physician or other qualified professional, and in consultation with any gatekeeper designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g), that the patient’s present primary need is for medical treatment or care and whose need for psychiatric care is secondary, the court may delay ordering directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization of the patient until such time as the patient receives medical care and the patient’s need for psychiatric care is primary.

In proceedings under this section involving a minor, the court shall, to the extent feasible, consult with the minor’s parents or legal guardian.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 25-60; Laws 1971, ch. 208, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-112; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; ch. 217, § 1; 1999, ch. 172, § 2; 2001, ch. 14, § 1; 2006, ch. 111, § 1; 2007, ch. 66, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2013 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective March 11, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to jurisdiction of district courts generally, see art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For provisions on commissioners, see §§

5-3-301

through

5-3-312

.

For provisions relating to notice, see Rules 5 and 6, W.R.C.P.

For provisions relating to jury trial proceedings, see Rules 38 and 39, W.R.C.P.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “in the county in which the person is initially detained” in (a); and inserted “and the state hospital shall serve as a hospital of last resort to receive patients if no designated hospital or other licensed treatment facility is readily available” in the introductory language of (j).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), added the second sentence; in (j) deleted “, and the state hospital shall serve as a hospital of last resort to receive patients if no designated hospital or other licensed treatment facility is readily available.”

Laws 2007, ch. 66, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 16, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e), substituted “licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist, the court shall appoint a licensed physician, licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist” for “or psychiatrist, the court shall appoint a licensed physician or psychiatrist,” and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (o).

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 2, in (d), inserted “any gatekeeper designated by the department” in the introductory language, added (d)(vii), and made a stylistic change; in (h), inserted “shall consider the testimony of any gatekeeper designated by the department” following “the court”; in (j), inserted “give consideration to any recommendations by the gatekeeper” in the introductory language, inserted the present last sentence of (j)(i)(E), redesignated (j)(iii) as (j)(iv), and added (j)(iii); in (k), inserted “directed outpatient commitment under W.S.

25-10-110

.1 or the” preceding “involuntary hospitalization”; in (n), inserted “or other qualified professional, and in consultation with any gatekeeper designated by the department pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(g)” in the second sentence, and in the last sentence substituted “directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization” for “the commitment” and deleted “to the Wyoming state hospital”; and in (o), substituted “court” for “department.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 3, repealed former (j)(ii), which read: “Suspend the proceedings pending voluntary treatment as approved by the examiner and by the facility or individual who will provide the treatment. If the court finds that the proposed patient does not require continuous inpatient hospitalization, would be more appropriately treated in an outpatient treatment program or a combination of outpatient and inpatient treatment or will be able to appropriately control his illness by following a prescribed treatment plan, the court shall consider such treatment options. If the court finds that the proposed patient does not require continuous hospitalization and the funding is available, it shall consider conditional outpatient treatment for a period of time deemed appropriate and may designate an outpatient care provider, including mental health centers. Conditional outpatient treatment may require periodic reporting, continuation of medication and submission to testing and restriction of travel, consumption of alcoholic beverages or drugs, associations with other persons or other reasonable conditions as the court may specify provided the court may suspend the imposition of the conditional outpatient treatment order for failure to meet the conditions and order involuntary hospitalization under this section; or.”

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

In subsection (c), “and prosecuting” was deleted preceding “attorney of the county” as it appeared in § 3, ch. 62, Laws 1982, in order to give effect to the amendment made by § 1, ch. 22, Sp. Sess., Laws 1981.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

County attorney’s duties. —

Because statutes with respect to the specific duties of a county attorney in emergency detention and involuntary hospitalization proceedings are ambiguous, the district court did not err in denying appellants' petition for a writ of mandamus directing the county attorney to commence court proceedings and to appear at initial emergency detention hearings as well as to appear and present the case in chief. State ex rel. W. Park Hosp. Dist. v. Skoric, 2014 WY 41, 321 P.3d 334,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2014).

Involuntary hospitalization order reversed where no hearing to determine necessity of continued detention. —

As the court, sua sponte, treated the preliminary hearing following emergency detention as a hearing on the involuntary hospitalization application, no hearing to determine the necessity of continued detention being held within 36 (now (72)) hours, as required by § 25-10-109(h), the trial court's finding that the person in question was “mentally ill,” and its order for involuntary hospitalization, had to be reversed. In Interest of AM, 694 P.2d 734,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 441

(Wyo. 1985).

Involuntary hospitalization not an abuse of discretion. —

The district court did not abuse its discretion in determining pursuant to § 25-10-110(j) that hospitalization in the Wyoming State Hospital was the least restrictive and most therapeutic alternative available where the professionals testified at defendant's trial that defendant would be a danger to himself if he were allowed to live on his own, defendant's mental health caseworker testified he did not believe his organization could give adequate support for defendant to maintain himself in a stabilized condition, and, even though defendant had access to his mother's residence, his disease prevented him from living independently. Baker v. State, 2002 WY 116, 50 P.3d 712,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2002).

County's authority. —

Trial court did not err in holding that a county attorney had no
right to object to the discharge of a patient who had been involuntarily
hospitalized; the authority of county attorneys was limited to representing
the public in initial proceedings for involuntary hospitalization. State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15, 294 P.3d 24,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2013).

Involuntary commitment of inmate. —

If the experts believe that defendant continues to be a danger to himself and others at the time his sentence ends, additional proceedings pursuant to this section may be warranted at that time. Page v. State, 949 P.2d 466,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1997).

Function of commissioner. —

The designated court commissioner under subsection (k) has no more extended function than initial fact finding and entry of preliminary orders. The recommendations — conclusions based upon fact as well as law which are distilled into judgment orders — cannot be blindly accepted by the district court. K.C. v. State, 771 P.2d 774,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1989).

No right to psychiatric halfway house treatment. —

The district court's placement of the respondent at the state hospital was not an abuse of discretion, and the respondent was not denied her “right to treatment” merely because she was not being treated in a psychiatric halfway house. K.C. v. State, 771 P.2d 774,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1989).

Applied

in

Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

Stated

in

Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2005); United States v. Bradley, 417 F.3d 1107,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 15477

(2005).

Cited

in

Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001); C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of rules as to standard of proof required in civil commitment proceedings, 97 ALR3d 780.

Necessity and sufficiency of statements informing one under investigation for involuntary commitment of right to remain silent, 23 ALR4th 563.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement, 43 ALR5th 777.

§ 25-10-110.1.
Directed outpatient commitment proceedings.

If the court finds based upon the recommendation of an examiner or on its own determination that the proposed patient is mentally ill but does not require inpatient hospitalization, the court shall consider issuing a directed outpatient commitment order. The court shall require directed outpatient commitment for the proposed patient for a period of time as determined appropriate by the court, not to exceed two (2) years with review by the court at least every six (6) months. The court may designate an outpatient care provider that will provide care to the proposed patient.

In considering whether directed outpatient commitment is appropriate, the court may consider one (1) or more of the following:

The proposed patient is diagnosed as having a mental illness;

Without directed outpatient treatment, the proposed patient is likely to be dangerous to himself or others based upon noncompliance with prior medical directives;

The proposed patient is likely to suffer substantial medical or mental deterioration or become seriously disabled;

The proposed patient lacks present ability to make an informed decision concerning his need for treatment; or

Any other information concerning the proposed patient’s need for outpatient care.

The terms and conditions of the treatment plan shall be established by an examiner in consultation with any gatekeeper designated by the department and approved by the court. In preparing the plan, the examiner shall consult with the county attorney, treating health care providers and the patient or the person responsible for the care and custody of the patient, if known.

The treatment plan may require:

Periodic reporting;

Continuation of medication and submission to testing;

Restrictions on travel;

Restrictions on consumption of alcoholic beverages and drugs with requirements for any necessary testing;

Use of community based group homes, crisis assistance centers or other available community based support services;

Temporary inpatient or residential treatment for stabilization;

Other conditions as agreed upon by the respective parties or as otherwise directed by the court.

Treatment shall be provided by a treatment center or a court approved treatment provider.

The treatment center or treatment provider or any other person identified in the treatment plan shall report to the county attorney and any gatekeeper designated by the department any material noncompliance by the patient with the treatment plan.

By motion of an interested party or on its own motion, the court may revoke or modify the directed outpatient commitment if, after a hearing, the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that the patient violated any condition of the directed outpatient commitment order. If there has been a violation of the order, the court may modify the conditions of directed outpatient commitment, schedule an involuntary commitment hearing pursuant to W.S.

25-10-110

, order any disposition for which private resources are available or order any disposition which is consistent with the best interests of the proposed patient and public safety.

If a motion has been filed to modify or revoke the directed outpatient commitment, the court may enter an ex parte order for immediate detention of the patient if the court finds that the patient is a danger to himself or others. If the court enters an ex parte order of detention, the matter shall be set for hearing within seventy-two (72) hours. Notice of a hearing on a motion to modify or revoke the order for directed outpatient commitment shall be as provided in W.S. 25-10-110(d).

The county attorney of the county where the directed outpatient commitment order is filed shall appear on behalf of the state at any hearing pursuant to this section.

History.

2016 ch. 102, § 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016 ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 25-10-111.
Commitment or transfer to federal hospital; effect of orders by courts of other jurisdictions; powers of federal facility.

The court, when ordering involuntary hospitalization pursuant to W.S. 25-10-110(j), may order a person hospitalized in a hospital or facility operated by the veterans’ administration or another federal agency, if the court has received a certificate from the agency showing that facilities are available and that the patient is eligible for treatment therein.

An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia, authorizing hospitalization of a person by an agency of the United States, has the same force and effect as to the person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which the order was made.

Upon receipt of a certificate from the veterans’ administration or another federal agency that facilities are available for treatment of a patient involuntarily hospitalized under W.S.

25-10-110

and that the patient is eligible for treatment therein, the head of a hospital may transfer the patient to the veterans’ administration or other federal agency for treatment. The court which ordered involuntary hospitalization shall be notified of the transfer by the hospital. No person shall be transferred if he is confined pursuant to a conviction for a crime or if he has been acquitted of a criminal charge solely on the ground of mental illness or deficiency, unless, prior to the transfer, the court which committed the person enters an order for the transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

Upon admission to a federal facility pursuant to this section, the patient is subject to the rules and regulations of the veterans’ administration or other federal agency. The chief officer of the federal facility in which the patient is hospitalized has the same powers as the head of the state hospital with respect to retention, transfer, release and discharge of patients.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 26-61; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-113; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

in (a), inserted “involuntary” preceding “hospitalization”; and in (c), inserted “involuntarily” preceding “hospitalized” in the first sentence and “involuntary” preceding “hospitalization” in the second sentence.

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.